Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Foreign Investment Trusts

§79-15-101.
Certificate of authority; necessity of; what constitutes not transacting business.

No foreign investment trust shall have the right to transact business in this state until it shall have procured a certificate of authority so to do from the secretary of state. No foreign investment trust shall be entitled to procure a certificate of authority under Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 to transact in this state any business which an investment trust organized under the Mississippi Investment Trust Law is not permitted to transact. A foreign investment trust shall not be denied a certificate of authority by reason of the fact that the laws of the state or country under which such foreign investment trust is organized governing its organization and internal affairs differ from the laws of this state, and nothing contained in Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 shall be construed to authorize this state to regulate the organization or the internal affairs of such foreign investment trust.

Without excluding other activities which may not constitute transacting business in this state, a foreign investment trust shall not be considered to be transacting business in this state, for the purposes of Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139, by reason of carrying on in this state any one (1) or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes.

Maintaining bank accounts.

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of its securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositaries with relation to its securities.

Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where such orders require acceptance without this state before becoming binding contracts.

Transacting any business in interstate commerce.

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of thirty (30) days and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

Investing in or acquiring, in transactions outside of Mississippi, royalties and other non-operating mineral interests, and the execution of division orders, contracts of sale and other instruments incidental to the ownership of such non-operating mineral interests.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Domestic investment trusts, see §§ 79-15-1 et seq.

Filing fees, see § 79-15-135.

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Business Trusts § 75.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 11, 51, 52, 56.

§79-15-103.
Rights and responsibilities similar to domestic trusts.

A foreign investment trust which shall have received a certificate of authority under Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 shall, until a certificate of revocation or of withdrawal shall have been issued as provided in Sections 79-15-123 through 79-15-129, enjoy the same, but no greater, rights and privileges as a domestic investment trust organized for the purposes set forth in the application pursuant to which such certificate of authority is issued; and, except as in Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 otherwise provided, shall be subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties and liabilities now or hereafter imposed upon a domestic investment trust of like character.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Domestic investment trusts, see §§ 79-15-1 et seq.

§79-15-105.
Name of foreign investment trust.

No certificate of authority shall be issued to a foreign investment trust unless the name of such foreign investment trust:

shall contain the words “investment trust”, or such foreign investment trust shall, for use in this state, add at the end of its name the words “investment trust”.

shall not contain any word or phrase which indicates or implies that it is organized for any purpose other than one or more of the purposes contained in its declaration of trust.

shall not be the same as, or deceptively similar to, the name of any domestic investment trust existing under the laws of this state or any foreign investment trust authorized to transact business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Domestic investment trusts, see §§ 79-15-1 et seq.

§79-15-107.
Prohibited change of name; penalties.

Whenever a foreign investment trust which is authorized to transact business in this state shall change its name to one under which a certificate of authority would not be granted to it on application therefor, the certificate of authority of such foreign investment trust shall be suspended and it shall not thereafter transact any business in this state until it has changed its name to a name which is available to it under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§79-15-109.
Certificate of authority; application.

A foreign investment trust, in order to procure a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, shall make application therefor to the Secretary of State, which application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign investment trust and the state or country under the laws of which it is organized.

If the name of the foreign investment trust does not contain the words “investment trust,” then the name containing the words “investment trust” which it elects to use in this state.

The date of declaration of trust and the period of duration of the trust.

The address of the principal office of the foreign investment trust in the state or country under the laws of which it is organized.

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a).

The purpose or purposes of the foreign investment trust which it proposes to pursue in the transaction of business in this state.

The names and respective addresses of the trustees of the foreign investment trust.

A statement of the aggregate number of shares of beneficial interest which the foreign investment trust has authority to issue and the unit value in dollars to be received by the trust for the issuance of each of such shares.

A statement of the aggregate number of issued shares of beneficial interest.

Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the Secretary of State to determine whether such corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and to determine and assess the fees payable as in Section 79-15-135 prescribed.

Such application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State and shall be executed in duplicate by at least three (3) of the trustees and verified.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 100, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (e), which read “the address of the proposed registered office of the foreign investment trust in this state, and the name of its proposed registered agent in this state at such address.”

§79-15-111.
Certificate of authority; issuance.

Duplicate originals of the application of the foreign investment trust for a certificate of authority shall be delivered to the secretary of state, together with a copy of its declaration of trust and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the proper officer where its declaration of trust and amendments thereto were recorded under the laws of the state or country where it is organized.

If the secretary of state finds that such application conforms to law, he shall, when all fees have been paid as in Section 79-15-135 prescribed:

endorse on each of such documents the word “FILED”, and the month, day and year of the filing thereof.

file in his office one (1) of such duplicate originals of the application and the copy of the declaration of trust and amendments thereto.

issue a certificate of authority to transact business in this state to which he shall affix the other duplicate original application.

The certificate of authority, together with the duplicate original of the application affixed thereto by the secretary of state, shall be returned to the foreign investment trust or its representative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§79-15-113.
Certificate of authority; right to transact business upon issuance; right of state to revoke or suspend.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of authority by the secretary of state, the foreign investment trust shall be authorized to transact business in this state for those purposes set forth in its application, subject, however, to the right of this state to suspend or to revoke such authority as provided in Section 79-15-129.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§79-15-115.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 137, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-15-115. [Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1978.]

Former § 79-15-115 pertained to requirement to maintain registered office and registered agent in state. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-15-117.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 138, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-15-117. [Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1978.]

Former § 79-15-117 pertained to change of registered office and registered agent and resignation of registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-15-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 139, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-15-119. [Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1978.]

Former § 79-15-119 pertained to service of process. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-15-121.
Declaration of trust; filing of amendment.

Whenever the declaration of trust of a foreign investment trust authorized to transact business in this state is amended, such foreign investment trust shall, within sixty (60) days after such amendment becomes effective, file in the office of the secretary of state a copy of such amendment duly authenticated by the proper officer where its declaration of trust and amendments thereto were recorded under the laws of the state or country where it is organized. The filing thereof shall not of itself enlarge or alter the purpose or purposes which such foreign investment trust is authorized to pursue in the transaction of business in this state, nor authorize such foreign investment trust to transact business in this state under any other name than the name set forth in its certificate of authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

In 2009, a typographical error in the first sentence was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “business in this state is amended” for “business in this state are amended.” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Filing fees, see § 79-15-135.

4 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Business Trusts § 51:15.

§79-15-123.
Certificate of authority; amendments.

A foreign investment trust authorized to transact business in this state shall procure an amended certificate of authority in the event it changes its name, or desires to pursue in this state other or additional purposes than those set forth in its prior application for a certificate of authority, by making application therefor to the secretary of state.

The requirements in respect to the form and contents of such application, the manner of its execution, the filing of duplicate originals thereof with the secretary of state, the issuance of an amended certificate of authority and the effect thereof, shall be the same as in the case of an original application for a certificate of authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Filing fees, see § 79-15-135.

§79-15-125.
Certificate of withdrawal; application and filing.

A foreign investment trust authorized to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state upon procuring from the secretary of state a certificate of withdrawal. In order to procure such certificate of withdrawal, such foreign investment trust shall deliver to the secretary of state an application for withdrawal, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign investment trust and the state or country under the laws of which it is organized.

That the foreign investment trust is not transacting business in this state.

That the foreign investment trust surrenders its authority to transact business in this state.

That the foreign investment trust revokes the authority of its registered agent in this state to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action, suit or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the foreign investment trust was authorized to transact business in this state may thereafter be made on such foreign investment trust by service thereof on the secretary of state.

A post-office address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process against the foreign investment trust that may be served on him.

Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine and assess any unpaid fees payable by such foreign investment trust as in Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 prescribed, and a certificate of the state tax commission that the foreign investment trust owes no sales taxes.

The application for withdrawal shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the secretary of state and shall be executed by the trust by at least three (3) of its trustees and verified by them, or if the foreign investment trust is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, shall be executed on behalf of the foreign investment trust by such receiver or trustee and verified by him.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Section 27-3-4 provides that the terms “ ‘Mississippi State Tax Commission,’ ‘State Tax Commission,’ “Tax Commission’ and ‘commission’ appearing in the laws of this state in connection with the performance of the duties and functions by the Mississippi State Tax Commission, the State Tax Commission or Tax Commission shall mean the Department of Revenue.”

Filing fees, see § 79-15-135.

§79-15-127.
Certificate of withdrawal; issuance.

Duplicate originals of such application for withdrawal shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that such application conforms to the provisions of Section 79-15-125, he shall, when all fees and sales taxes have been paid as by law prescribed:

Endorse on each of such duplicate originals the word “Filed,” and the month, day and year of the filing thereof.

File one (1) of such duplicate originals in his office.

Issue a certificate of withdrawal to which he shall affix the other duplicate original.

The certificate of withdrawal, together with the duplicate original of the application for withdrawal affixed thereto by the secretary of state, shall be returned to the foreign investment trust or its representative. Upon the issuance of such certificate of withdrawal, the authority of the foreign investment trust to transact business in this state shall cease.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

Filing fees, see § 79-15-135.

§79-15-129.
Certificate of authority; revocation; causes.

The certificate of authority of a foreign investment trust to transact business in this state may be revoked by the Secretary of State upon the conditions prescribed in this section when:

The foreign investment trust has failed to pay any fees prescribed by Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 when they have become due and payable;

The foreign investment trust has failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state as required by Section 79-15-115;

The foreign investment trust has failed, after change of its registered agent, to file in the Office of the Secretary of State a statement of such change as required by Section 79-35-8;

The foreign investment trust has failed to file in the Office of the Secretary of State any amendment to its declaration of trust within the time prescribed by Section 79-15-121; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted by such foreign investment trust pursuant to Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139.

No certificate of authority of a foreign investment trust shall be revoked by the Secretary of State unless (1) he shall have given the foreign investment trust not less than sixty (60) days’ notice thereof by mail as provided by Section 79-35-13, and (2) the foreign investment trust shall fail prior to revocation to pay such fees, or file the required statement of change of registered agent, or file such articles of amendment or correct such misrepresentation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 16; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 101, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “79-35-8” for “79-15-117; or” at the end of (c); and, in the last paragraph, substituted ‘by mail as provided by Section 79-35-13,‘ for ‘addressed to its registered office in this state‘ in (1), and deleted “or registered office” following “registered agent” in (2).

Filing fees, see § 79-15-135.

§79-15-131.
Certificate of authority; revocation; procedure.

Upon revoking any such certificate of authority, the Secretary of State shall:

Issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate.

File one (1) of such certificates in his office.

Mail to such foreign investment trust as provided in Section 79-35-13 a notice of such revocation accompanied by one (1) of such certificates.

Upon issuance of such certificate of revocation, the authority of the foreign investment trust to transact business in this state shall cease.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 17; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 102, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment. effective January 1, 2013, inserted “as provided in Section 79-35-13” in (c).

§79-15-133.
Certificate of authority; failure to obtain; ability to sue and be sued.

No foreign investment trust transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority shall be permitted to maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state. Nor shall any action, suit or proceeding be maintained in any court of this state by any successor or assignee of such foreign investment trust on any right, claim or demand arising out of the transaction of business by such foreign investment trust in this state.

The failure of a foreign investment trust to obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state shall not impair the validity of any contract or act of such foreign investment trust, and shall not prevent such foreign investment trust from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state.

A foreign investment trust which transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority shall be liable to this state, for the years or parts thereof during which it transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority, in an amount equal to all fees which would have been imposed by Section 79-15-135 upon such foreign investment trust had it duly applied for and received a certificate of authority to transact business in this state as required by Sections 79-15-101 et seq. and thereafter filed all reports required by said sections, plus all penalties imposed by said sections for failure to pay such fees. The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover all amounts due this state under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

12 C.J.S., Business Trusts §§ 11, 51, 52, 56.

§79-15-135.
Fees.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect from foreign investment trust for:

The fees required by Section 79-35-3.

Filing an application of a foreign investment trust for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing a certificate of authority, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

Filing an application of a foreign investment trust for an amended certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing an amended certificate of authority, Twenty Dollars ($20.00).

Filing a copy of an amendment to the articles of incorporation of a foreign investment trust holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, Twenty Dollars ($20.00).

Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign investment trust and issuing a certificate of withdrawal, Five Dollars ($5.00).

Filing any other statement or report of a foreign investment trust, Five Dollars ($5.00).

For furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper relating to a foreign investment trust, Sixty Cents (60¢) per page and Two Dollars ($2.00) for the certificate and affixing the seal thereto, with a minimum charge of Three Dollars ($3.00).

At the time of any service of process on him as resident agent of a foreign investment trust, Five Dollars ($5.00), which amount may be recovered as taxable cost by the party to the suit or action causing such service to be made if such party prevails in the suit or action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, §§ 19, 20; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 103, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (a), which formerly read: “Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent, or both, five dollars ($ 5.00).”

§79-15-137.
Disbursement of collected funds.

All fees and charges to be collected by the secretary of state under the provisions of Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 including the assessment and collection thereof of all penalties shall be paid into the general funds of the state treasury, less ten percent (10%) as received thereof to be retained and used by the secretary of state as necessary expense to administer the provisions of said sections as the secretary of state deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§79-15-139.
Law applicable to foreign investment trusts previously transacting business in state.

Foreign investment trusts which are transacting business in this state at the time Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139 take effect, for a purpose or purposes for which a foreign investment trust might secure such authority under Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139, shall, subject to the limitations set forth in their respective certificates of authority, charters or articles of incorporation, be entitled to all the rights and privileges applicable to foreign investment trusts procuring certificates of authority to transact business in this state under Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139, and from the time said sections take effect such foreign investment trust shall be subject to all the limitations, restrictions, liabilities and duties prescribed herein for foreign investment trusts procuring certificates of authority to transact business in this state under Sections 79-15-101 through 79-15-139.

Within one (1) year from July 1, 1978, said foreign investment trust transacting business within this state at the time said sections take effect shall secure a certificate of authority or be subject to the penalties, restrictions and limitations otherwise herein provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 463, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1978.